data/hungarian.aff
SFX á   0    ozható       [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ĎŇÖAUKicFQX
SFX á   0    ozhatott     [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X
SFX á   0    ozhatatlanság [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAtAtlAn_UNABLE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} mŇÖAUKicSsX
SFX á   0    ozhatatlan   [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAtAtlAn_UNABLE_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇÖAUKicFQsX.%
SFX á   0    ozhat        [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} Oo%X
SFX á   0    ozgató       [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ĎŇÖAUKicFQX
SFX á   0    ozgatás      [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ás_PROCESS/RESULT_noun]{+[NOM]} mŇÖAUKicXSs
SFX á   0    ozgatott     [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇAUKicFQX%s
SFX á   0    ozgatott     [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X
SFX á   0    ozgathatóság [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} mŇÖAUKicSsX
SFX á   0    ozgatható    [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ĎŇÖAUKicFQX
SFX á   0    ozgathatott  [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X
SFX á   0    ozgathat     [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} Oo%X
SFX á   0    ozgat        [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} Oo%X
SFX á   0    ozatlanság   [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAlAn_LESS_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} mŇÖAUKicQX
SFX á   0    ozatlan      [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAlAn_LESS_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇÖAUKicFQsX%
SFX á   0    ozandó       [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[AndÓ_FUTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ĎŇÖAUKicFQX%
SFX á   0    oz           [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} OoX%
SFX á   0    osító        [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ĎŇÖAUKicFQX
SFX á   0    osítás       [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ás_PROCESS/RESULT_noun]{+[NOM]} mŇÖAUKicXSs
SFX á   0    osíttató     [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ĎŇÖAUKicFQX
SFX á   0    osíttatás    [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ás_PROCESS/RESULT_noun]{+[NOM]} mŇÖAUKicXSs
SFX á   0    osíttatott   [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇAU$icFQsX%
SFX á   0    osíttatott   [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X
SFX á   0    osíttathat   [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} Oo%X
SFX á   0    osíttatandó  [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[AndÓ_FUTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ĎŇÖAUKicFQX%
SFX á   0    osíttat      [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} OoX%
SFX á   0    osítottság   [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} mŇÖAUKicSsX
SFX á   0    osított      [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇAU$icFQsX%
SFX á   0    osított      [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X
SFX á   0    osíthatóság  [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} mŇÖAUKicSsX
SFX á   0    osítható     [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ĎŇÖAUKicFQX
SFX á   0    osíthatott   [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇAUKicFQX%s
SFX á   0    osíthatott   [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X
SFX á   0    osíthatatlanság [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAtAtlAn_UNABLE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} mŇÖAUKicSsX
SFX á   0    osíthatatlan [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAtAtlAn_UNABLE_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇÖAUKicFQsX%
SFX á   0    osíthat      [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} Oo%X
SFX á   0    osítgató     [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ĎŇÖAUKicFQX
SFX á   0    osítgatás    [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ás_PROCESS/RESULT_noun]{+[NOM]} mŇÖAUKicXSs
SFX á   0    osítgatott   [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} mŇAUKicFQX%s
SFX á   0    osítgatott   [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X
SFX á   0    osítgathatóság [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} mŇÖAUKicSsX
SFX á   0    osítgatható  [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ĎŇÖAUKicFQX
SFX á   0    osítgathatott [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X
SFX á   0    osítgathat   [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} Oo%X
SFX á   0    osítgat      [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} Oo%X
SFX á   0    osítatlanság [^aáeéiíoóöőuúüű]         [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAlAn_LESS_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} mŇÖAUKicQX
