data/hungarian.dic
újfasizmus/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
öregkor/UĘŽiÖKmŇáyÇżßSsYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
óriásbolygó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
élővirág/wYUĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSscˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
áteresznyílás/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
árajánlat/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
ágyékkendő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁáYc˝	[noun]{+[NOM]}
zsúrkocsi/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
zavargás/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
vízgyógyászat/UĘŽiÖKmŇáyÇżßSsYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
várható/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
vizeskancsó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
vinyetta/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
verőértágulat/UĘŽiÖKmŇáyÇżßSsYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
vargánya/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
utókúra/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
ugrás/XUĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	ugrik[vrb]+[Ás_PROCESS/RESULT_noun]{+[NOM]}
töményital/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
táska/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
turbó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
tonzúra/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
tenzor/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăQYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
tank/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăQYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
szövegmagyarázat/UĘŽiÖKmŇáyÇżßSsYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
számlap/UĘŽiÖKmŇáyÇżßQYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
szkunksz/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
szemétlapát/UĘŽiÖKmŇáyÇżßQYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
szabaddobás/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
sokszorosító/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
rövidital/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
rokon/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
reintubáció/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
pólyás/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
pub/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăQYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
potroh/ŐUĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
planimetria/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
pausz/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
pallérozatlanság/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
oposszum/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
nyárutó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
neuroendokrinológia/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
nabla/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
multipólus/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
minuta/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
megváltozás/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
martinász/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
magunkfajta/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[adj]{+[NOM]}
lábfagyás/UĘŽiÖKmŇáyÇżßSsYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
lenyomat/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
külszolgálat/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
kézimunkaminta/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
kurucnóta/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛Ăăcˇťw	[noun]{+[NOM]}
korreláció/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
komplexifikált/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăQYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
kiválás/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
kihívó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
karó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
kaliba/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
jobbrafordulás/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
interjú/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
igealak/UĘŽiÖKmŇáyÇżßQYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
hátizsák/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăQYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
holyva/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
heliofóbia/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
halottvivő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔíyČÁáYc˝	[noun]{+[NOM]}
gésa/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
gyalog/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
gepida/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
főtartó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáyÇżßYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
frank/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăQYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
fluorokinolon/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăQYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
feltárulkozás/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
faragvány/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
eszközár/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăQYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
eltulajdonítás/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
ejakulátum/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
drogéria/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
differencia/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
dajka/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
csirkecomb/UĘŽiÖKmŇáyÇżßQYcť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
cirok/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăQYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
bérbeadó/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
boszorkány/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
bimetall/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăQYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
barázda/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
atyádfia/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]+[POSS_SG_3]{+[NOM]}
aorta/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
alulfoglalkoztatottság/UĘŽiÖKmŇáç˛ĂăSsYcˇťk	[noun]{+[NOM]}
ajtónálló/ŐAUQĘŽiĎŇáç˛ĂăYcˇť	[noun]{+[NOM]}
Szedő/ŐCWRĚŻjŢÔqČÁá¸	[noun_prs]{+[NOM]}
